src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! # Swedish conjunctions & subjunctions


LEXICON conj
!! @LEXNAME@ for the tag +CC
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON subj
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ gives tag +CS
 +CS: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
!! @LEXNAME@  och, att, emedan, ..
allteftersom subj ;
alltsedan subj ;
antingen conj ;
att subj ;
att+IM:att # ;
bara subj ;
både conj ;
dels conj ;
då  subj ;
eftersom subj ;
eller conj ;
emedan subj ;
fast subj ;
fastän subj ;
för subj ;
förrän subj ;
huruvida subj ;
ifall subj ;
innan subj ;
liksom subj ;
medan subj ;
men conj ;
när subj ;
och conj ;
om subj ;
samt conj ;
sedan subj ;
som subj ;
så subj ;
såvida subj ;
såvitt subj ;
såväl subj ;
tills subj ;
ty conj ;
utan conj ;
!vare sig subj ;
varken conj ;
än subj ;
ömsom conj ;
